Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-374
Department of Revenue; efficiency recommendations; report; to whom.

Where the Department of Revenue shall find that the administration of the revenue and property tax laws of the state might be more efficiently and economically conducted, it shall cause to be prepared recommendations to effect the desired objective. Such recommendations shall be given to the Governor and the chairperson of the appropriate legislative committee when the Legislature is next in regular session following the development of the recommendations. Should the Legislature be in regular session at the time such recommendations are compiled, the recommendations shall be communicated to the Governor and the appropriate committee of the Legislature.

Laws 1965, c. 459, § 13, p. 1459;

R.S.1943, (1976), § 77-332;

Laws 1980, LB 834, § 15;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 26.